North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-03.1 Organizational Session

54-03.1-01.
Declaration of purpose. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 427, § 9.

54-03.1-02.
Time and place of meeting — Who must attend.

In each even-numbered year on the first Monday in the month of December or on a date selected by the legislative management but not earlier than December first nor later than December fifteenth, all persons elected at the previous November general election as members of the succeeding legislative session, and members whose terms do not expire until the first day of December following the next November general election, shall meet in the state capitol in the city of Bismarck, or at such other place as may be designated, at a time designated by the legislative management for the purpose of conducting an organizational session. The legislative management shall call the organizational session and the legislative council shall make such arrangements as may be necessary for operation of the session.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 342, § 2; 1969, ch. 427, § 7; 1969, ch. 448, § 23; 1987, ch. 259, § 12; 1999, ch. 444, § 1; 2005, ch. 473, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 43.

Cross-References.

“Organizational session” and “regular session” defined, see N.D.C.C. § 54-03-02.1.

54-03.1-03.
Agenda.

The agenda of the organizational session must include the following:

Orientation classes upon legislative rules and procedure for new legislators;

Presentation of reports by legislative interim committees or commissions;

Party caucuses to review proposed legislative rules and committee assignments, as appropriate;

Appointment of procedural committees;

Presentation of the budget and revenue proposals recommended by the governor as provided in section 54-44.1-07; and

All other similar matters, in order that the legislative assembly be fully organized and ready to begin its business by the first day of the regular session.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 342, § 3; 1969, ch. 427, § 8; 1989, ch. 632, § 1; 2003, ch. 458, § 1.

54-03.1-04.
Compensation for attending legislators. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 427, § 9.